Utah statutes.
48-3a-701.   Events causing dissolution.

A limited liability company is dissolved, and its activities and affairs must be wound up, upon the occurrence of any of the following:

(1)  an event or circumstance that the operating agreement states causes dissolution;

(2)  the consent of all the members;

(3)  the passage of 90 consecutive days during which the limited liability company has no members unless:

(a)  consent to admit at least one specified person as a member is given by transferees owning the rights to receive a majority of distributions as transferees at the time the consent is to be effective; and

(b)  at least one person becomes a member in accordance with the consent;

(4)  on application by a member, the entry by the district court of an order dissolving the limited liability company on the grounds that:

(a)  the conduct of all or substantially all of the limited liability company's activities and affairs is unlawful; or

(b)  it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the limited liability company's activities and affairs in conformity with the certificate of organization and the operating agreement;

(5)  on application by a member, the entry by the district court of an order dissolving the limited liability company on the grounds that the managers or those members in control of the limited liability company:

(a)  have acted, are acting, or will act in a manner that is illegal or fraudulent; or

(b)  have acted, are acting, or will act in a manner that is oppressive and was, is, or will be directly harmful to the applicant; or

(6)  the signing and filing of a statement of administrative dissolution by the division under Subsection 48-3a-708(3).



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

